Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-254.02
Temporary detention rules and regulations; Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice; duties.

The Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall adopt, promulgate, and implement rules and regulations to harmonize state and federal law on the temporary detention of juveniles.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 18.